Tennessee, session 114, SB0531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 39, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The TBI shall classify a person who is required to register pursuant to this
part with a qualifying conviction under § 40-39-202, or who is required to register
pursuant to § 40-39-203(a)(2) as a sexual offender, violent sexual offender, or violent
juvenile sexual offender, and whether an offender is an offender against children, as
defined in § 40-39-202.
(b) The TBI may rely on investigative reports; files of a United States attorney,
district attorney general, or other prosecutorial entity; court records; or other credible
information in classifying an offender under this section.
(c) The TBI shall notify the offender of the classification.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0531
002480
- 1 -